Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.015

Divisions of department—Reassignment of division functions.

Except for the functions specified in RCW 43.23.070, the director may, at his or her discretion, reassign any of the functions delegated to the various divisions of the department under the provisions of this chapter or any other law to any other division of the department.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5103; 1983 c 248 s 4; 1967 c 240 s 15.]